src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON v4_lla !!≈ * **@CODE@** cont lexica v4_lla-type ajatella etc
+V+Inf:^WG%>ll^A KK ;
+V+Inf+Tra:^WG%>ll^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:^WGllen K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:^WGlle%>ss^A K ;
+V+Pass+InfE+Ine:^WG%>lt^Aess^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:le%>^HMET2mh^A^An K ; ! 
+V+InfMa+Ill:le%>mh^A^An K ; 
+V+InfMa+Ine:le%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ela:le%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Abe:le%>m^Att^A K ;

!+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:^WG^HMET2%>h^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:^WGl%>h^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:^WGl%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:^WGl%>^N^A K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:^WGl%>t^U K ;

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:^WGl%>l^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:^WGl%>l^Ut K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:^WGl%>t^U K ;
!+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:^WG%>heet K ; !15/9
!+V+Act+PrfPrc:hee x3_oblique ; !15/9 stryker pga WG
+V+Act+PrfPrc:^WGl%>hee x3_oblique ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:^WG%>hlee x3_oblique ; !15/9
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:l%>hee x3_oblique ;!puhuttehleen etc
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:%>hlee x3_oblique ; !puhuttelheen etc
+V+Pass+PrfPrc:^WG%>lt^U x3_oblique ;

+V+Act+PrsPrc:le%>v^A x3 ;
!+V+Pass+PrsPrc:^WG%>t^Av^A x3_oblique ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:^WGl%>t^Av^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:^WGl%>t^Av^At K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:^WGlt%>^Ai4s K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:le K ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:le # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg:l%>kh^O^On # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:^WGl%>kh^A^A # ;
!+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:%>kh^O^Ot # ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:le%>n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:le%>t K ;
!+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:e%>e K ; ! viekottelee
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:lle%>e K ;! viekottellee
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:le%>tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:le%>e K ; ! viekottelee
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^WGl%>h^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:le%>v^At K ; 

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:l%>i3n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:l%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:l%>i3 K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:l%>i3tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:l%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:l%>i3v^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:l%>i3v^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:^WGl%>thiin K ;

!+V+Act+Cond:%>i4s 2cond ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:l%>i4sin K ; ! 
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:l%>i4sit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:li4s K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:l%>i4s%>itt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:l%>i4s%>it K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:l%>i4s%>iv^A K ;

+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:^WGl%>t^U K ; !havattu
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:^WGl%>t^Ut K ; !havatut

+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2:l%>e # ;
+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2:^WGl%>k^O # ;

+V+Der/minen:lemi nen ;

LEXICON v4_lla_odd  !!≈ * **@CODE@** ajatella etc
v4_lla ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:le%>m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:le%>v^A K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:l%>i3m^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:l%>i4s%>imm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:l%>i4s%>ivv^A K ;
+V+AgPrc:le%>m^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ade:le%>m^All^A K ; 


LEXICON v4_lla_even   !!≈ * **@CODE@** lauella etc
v4_lla ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:le%>mm^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:le%>vv^A K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:le%>v^A K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:l%>i3mm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:l%>i4s%>im^A K ;
+V+AgPrc:le%>mm^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ade:le%>m^Al^A K ; 




LEXICON v5 !!≈ * **@CODE@**  tarvita:tarvi  
+V+Inf:t%>^A KK ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:tt%>en K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:tt%>et K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:tt%>ee K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:tt%>emm^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:tt%>ett^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:tt%>ev^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:tt%>evv^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:tt%>ee K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:tt%>ev^At K ;

+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>t^A K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:tt%>in K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:tt%>it K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:tt%>i K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:tt%>imm^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:tt%>itt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:tt%>it K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:tt%>iv^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:tt%>iv^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>thiin K ;

+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:%>thiin K ;
+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2:%>tte K ;
+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2:%>kk^O K ;
!+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2:%>ttek^O K ;


+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:tte # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg:t%>kh^O^On # ; !CHECK EK
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg:%>kh^O^On # ; !CHECK EK
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>kk^A^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:t%>kh^O^Ot # ; !CHECK EK
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:%>kh^O^Ot # ; !CHECK EK

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>^N^Ut K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>hneet K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>^Nhee x3_oblique ;
!+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:t%>t^U K ;
!+V+Pass+PrfPrc:t%>tee x3_oblique ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>tt^U K ; !havattu
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^Ut K ; !havatut

+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:tt%>i4sin K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:tt%>i4sit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:tt%>i4s K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:tt%>i4sim^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:tt%>i4sitt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:tt%>i4sit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:tt%>i4siv^A K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:tt%>^Ai4s K ; !TARVITTAIS
+V+Pass+Cond+Err/Orth:t%>as K ; !TARVITTAS

!+V+InfMa:%>tte 3infcase ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:%>tte%>^HMETAmh^A^An K ; ! 
+V+InfMa+Ine:%>tte%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ela:%>tte%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ade:%>tte%>m^Al^A K ; 
+V+InfMa+Abe:%>tte%>m^Att^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:%>tte%>hm^A^An K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:t%>ess^A K ;
+V+Pass+InfE+Ine:tt%>^Aess^A K ;
+V+InfE+Ins:t%>en K ;



!! DERIVATION and PARTICIPFORMS
+V+Der/minen:tt%>emi nen ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc:%>ttev^A x3 ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Err/Orth:%>ttevv^A x3 ;

+V+Pass+PrsPrc:t%>t^Av^A x3 ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Err/Orth:t%>t^Avv^A x3 ;
+V+AgPrc:tte%>m^A K ;


!! Forms not used in dict
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:t%>t^U K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>t^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg:%>^Ai4si K ; !CHECK
+V+Inf+Tra:t^A%>kse PxK ;


LEXICON v5_keritä !!≈ * **@CODE@**  keritä:kerki  
+V+Inf:ki%>tä KK ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:ki%>^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:ki%>^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:ki%>^A^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:ki%>^Amm^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:ki%>^Att^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:ki%>^Av^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:ki%>^A^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:i3%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:i3%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:ki^A K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:ki%>si3n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:ki%>si3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:ki%>si3 K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:ki%>si3mm^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:ki%>si3tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:ki%>si3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:ki%>si3v^A K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:ki%>si3v^At K ; 
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:%>i3thiin K ;
!+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:^WG%>t^U K ;

+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:ki%>^Aisi4n K ; ! 
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:ki%>^Aisi4t K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:ki^Ais K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:ki%>^Aisi4m^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:ki%>^Aisi4tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:ki%>^Aisi4t K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:ki%>^Aisi4v^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg:k%>^Ai4si K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:i%>tt^A%>i4s K ; 

+V+Inf+Tra:ki%>^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:it%>en K ; 
+V+InfE+Ine:it%>ess^A K ; 
+V+Pass+InfE+Ine:itt^A%>ess^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:ki^Amh^A^An K ; 
+V+InfMa+Ill:ki%>^Ahm^V^Vn K ; !CHECK GENERERAS EJ kerkiähmään
+V+InfMa+Ine:ki%>^Am^Ass^A K ; !kerkiämässä
+V+InfMa+Ela:ki%>^Am^Ast^A K ; 
+V+InfMa+Ade:ki%>^Am^All^A K ; 
+V+InfMa+Abe:ki%>^Am^Att^A K ;

+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:ki%>^Av^A K ; !kerkiävä
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:ki%>^Av^At K ; !kerkiävät
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:i%>tt^Av^A K ; !kerittävä
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:i%>tt^Av^At K ; !kerittävä


+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:i%>^N^U K ; !keriny
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:i%>^N^Ut K ; !kerinyt
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:i%>hneet K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:i%>nheet K ; 
+V+Act+PrfPrc:i%>hnee x3_oblique ; 
+V+Act+PrfPrc:i%>nhee x3_oblique ; 
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:i%>tt^U K ; 
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:i%>t^Ut K ; 

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:ki^A # ;
!+V+Act+Imprt+Sg:ä%>kh^O^On # ;
!+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:ä%>k^A^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:it%>kh^O^Ot # ;


+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>tt^U K ; !havattu
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>^t^Ut K ; !havatut
+V+AgPrc:ki%>^Am^A K ;

+V+Der/minen:t%>^Ami nen ;
