src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@** = The verb list 
tarvita:tarvi v5 ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
laella:late v4_lla_even  ;
maella:mate v4_lla_even  ;
vaihdella+Err/Lex:vaihte v4_lla_even  ;
liikahella:liikahte v4_lla_odd ;
nopahella:nopahte v4_lla_odd ;
nuhella:nuhe v4_lla_even  ;
voijella:voije v4_lla_even  ; ! xxx check
varjella:varje v4_lla_even  ;
nakella:nakke v4_lla_even  ;
langeskella:langeske v4_lla_odd ;
lauleskella:lauleske v4_lla_odd ;
pureskella:pureske v4_lla_odd ;
tuumiskella:tuumiske v4_lla_odd ;
karsiskella:karsiske v4_lla_odd ;
ujoskella:ujoske v4_lla_odd ;
juumoskella:juumoske v4_lla_odd ;
toivoskella:toivoske v4_lla_odd ;
kiehuskella:kiehuske v4_lla_odd ;
liikuskella:liikuske v4_lla_odd ;
tunnuskella:tunnuske v4_lla_odd ;
vihoskella:vihoske v4_lla_odd ;
nukella:nukke v4_lla_even  ;
toukella:toukke v4_lla_even  ;
kaalella:kaale v4_lla_even  ;
valella:vale v4_lla_even  ;
laulella:laule v4_lla_even  ;
ommella:ompe v4_lla_even  ;
painella:paine v4_lla_even  ;
kannella:kante v4_lla_even  ;
tunnella:tunte v4_lla_even  ;
lappella:lapp2e v4_lla_even  ;
pisarrella:pisarte v4_lla_odd ;
puurella:puurt4e v4_lla_even  ;    ! rt4:r
maksella:makse v4_lla_even  ;
annatella:annatte v4_lla_odd ;
puiketella:puikette v4_lla_odd ;
koetella:koette v4_lla_odd ;
puretella:purette v4_lla_odd ;
mujahtella:mujaht2e v4_lla_odd ;
laitella:laitte v4_lla_even  ;
ongitella:ongitte v4_lla_odd ;
loimitella:loimitte v4_lla_odd ;
juonitella:juonitte v4_lla_odd ;
maaritella:maaritte v4_lla_odd ;
tuutitella:tuutitte v4_lla_odd ;
maltella:maltte v4_lla_even  ;
poltella:poltte v4_lla_even  ;
paskantella:paskantte v4_lla_odd ;
purentella:purent2e v4_lla_odd ;
otella:otte v4_lla_even  ;
kouhotella:kouhotte v4_lla_odd ;
kiskotella:kiskotte v4_lla_odd ;
pallotella:pallotte v4_lla_odd ;
varotella:varotte v4_lla_odd ;
juotella:juotte v4_lla_even  ;
puotella:puotte v4_lla_even  ;
vuotella:vuotte v4_lla_even  ;
toivotella:toivotte v4_lla_odd ;
kangastella:kangaste v4_lla_odd ;
kastella:kaste v4_lla_even  ;
tarkastella:tarkaste v4_lla_odd ;
kinastella:kinaste v4_lla_odd ;
taivastella:taivaste v4_lla_odd ;
maistella:maiste v4_lla_even  ;
paistella:paiste v4_lla_even  ;
nuikistella:nuikiste v4_lla_odd ;
ummistella:ummiste v4_lla_odd ;
patistella:patiste v4_lla_odd ;
luistella:luiste v4_lla_even  ;
muistella:muiste v4_lla_even  ;
kehnostella:kehnoste v4_lla_odd ;
maustella:mauste v4_lla_even  ;
tieustella:tieuste v4_lla_odd ;
kukustella:kukuste v4_lla_odd ;
piipustella:piipuste v4_lla_odd ;
hosustella:hosuste v4_lla_odd ;
tievustella:tievuste v4_lla_odd ;
livahutella:livahutte v4_lla_even  ;
tuikutella:tuikutte v4_lla_odd ;
letkutella:letkutte v4_lla_odd ;
lerputella:lerputte v4_lla_odd ;
muutella:muutte v4_lla_even  ;
kivutella:kivutte v4_lla_odd ;
kaivella:kaive v4_lla_even  ;
kuivella:kuive v4_lla_even  ;
maijailla:maijai v4_lla_even  ; !Err/Orth CHECK t o m 2230
loikkailla:loikkai v4_lla_even  ;
ulkokullailla:ulko#kullai v4_lla_even  ;
meinailla:meinai v4_lla_even  ;
mahtailla:mahtai v4_lla_even  ;
lankeilla:lankei v4_lla_even  ;
valilla:vali v4_lla_even  ;
pakkoilla:pakkoi v4_lla_even  ;
lonkoilla:lonkoi v4_lla_even  ;
luppoilla:luppoi v4_lla_even  ;
loijuilla:loijui v4_lla_even  ;
loikolla:loikko v4_lla_even  ;
ansaita:ansai v5 ;
fangita:fangi v5 ; 
kuohita:kuohi v5 ;
karhita:karhi v5 ;
palkita:palki v5 ;
parkita:parki v5 ;
valita:vali v5 ; 
talita:tali v5 ;
hallita:halli v5 ;
kallita:kalli v5 ; !CHECK EK
solmita:solmi v5 ; 
tuomita:tuomi v5 ; 
mainita:maini v5 ;
punnita:punni v5 ;
kaupita:kaupi v5 ;
kaarita:kaari v5 ;
vaatita:vaati v5 ; 
vihloskella:vihloske v4_lla_odd ;
pahompiellä:pahom#pie v4_lla_even  ;
työjellä:työje v4_lla_even  ;
itkeskellä:itkeske v4_lla_odd ;
nirviskellä:nirviske v4_lla_odd ;
lykellä:lykke v4_lla_even  ;
likenellä:likent4e v4_lla_odd ;
lennellä:lente v4_lla_even  ;
vietellä:viette v4_lla_even  ;
lysmähtellä:lysmäht2e v4_lla_odd ;
lämmitellä:lämmitte v4_lla_odd ;
ässitellä:ässitte v4_lla_odd ;
täitellä:täitte v4_lla_even  ;
tyventellä:tyvent2e v4_lla_odd ;
kestellä:keste v4_lla_even  ;
vilistellä:viliste v4_lla_odd ;
pistellä:piste v4_lla_even  ;
näpistellä:näpiste v4_lla_odd ;
pyyristellä:pyyriste v4_lla_odd ;
lätystellä:lätyste v4_lla_odd ;
ärsytellä:ärsytte v4_lla_odd ;
tyytellä:tyytte v4_lla_even  ;
jönnötellä:jönnötte v4_lla_odd ;
löyellä:löyte v4_lla_even  ;
pilveillä:pilvei v4_lla_even  ;
läijäillä:läijäi v4_lla_even  ;
lykkäillä:lykkäi v4_lla_even  ;
töykköillä:töykköi v4_lla_even  ;
tilkitä:tilki v5 ; 
merkitä:merki v5 ;
hillitä:hilli v5 ;
villitä:villi v5 ;
kiepitä:kiepi v5 ; 
keritä:ker v5_keritä ;
häiritä:häiri v5 ;
kyytitä:kyyti v5 ; 
